Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.335

Miscellaneous state funds—Washington State University building account.

Upon and after June 30, 1961 the account in the state treasury known as the "State College of Washington Building Account" shall be known and referred to as the "Washington State University Building Account." This section shall not be construed as effecting any change in such fund other than the name thereof and as otherwise provided by law.

[ 1985 c 57 s 39; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.335. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 11 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.